California statutes. Insurance Code
(b) The penalty imposed by this section shall be imposed by and determined by the commissioner as provided by Section 1858.3, except that no penalty shall be imposed by the commissioner if a person has used any rate, rating plan, or rating system that has been approved for use by the commissioner in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

The penalty imposed by this section is appealable by means of any remedy provided by Section 12940 or by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Effective September 25, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

1858.1.

If after examination of an insurer, rating organization, advisory organization, or group, association, or other organization of insurers which engages in joint underwriting or joint reinsurance, or upon the basis of other information, or upon sufficient complaint as provided in Section 1858, the commissioner has good cause to believe that the insurer, organization, group, or association, or any rate, rating plan or rating system made or used by any such insurer or rating organization, does not comply with the requirements and standards of this chapter applicable to it, he or she shall give notice in writing to that insurer, organization, group, or association stating therein in what manner and to what extent that noncompliance is alleged to exist and specifying therein a reasonable time, not less than 10 days thereafter, in which that noncompliance may be corrected, and specifying therein the amount of any penalty that may be due under Section 1858.07.

An insurer, organization, group, or association served with that notice of noncompliance may, within the time specified therein, (a) establish to the satisfaction of the commissioner that the noncompliance does not exist, or (b) request a public hearing, notice of which shall be given at least 30 days prior to the date set for hearing, or (c) enter into an informal conciliation with the commissioner and any complainant making a complaint pursuant to Section 1858 to resolve the matter complained of, or (d) enter into a consent order with the commissioner to correct the specified noncompliance within a period of time specified in the consent order, and to pay any penalty due under Section 1858.07. A consent order shall provide that in the event the noncompliance is not corrected within the time specified therein that, in addition to any penalty due under Section 1858.07, a money penalty of not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) shall attach and be collected by the commissioner for each day the violation of the consent order continues. This money penalty shall not exceed in the aggregate the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) plus the penalty due under Section 1858.07. In addition to or in lieu of the procedure provided herein the commissioner may proceed with a public hearing as provided in Section 1858.2. 

For the purposes of this section, the failure to pay any penalty imposed pursuant to Section 1858.07 which has become final shall constitute a violation of a notice of noncompliance or of a consent order issued under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 726, Sec. 2.   Effective September 25, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

1858.15.

Once commenced, an examination pursuant to Section 1858.1 shall be promptly conducted and concluded within a reasonable time. If the examination is being conducted as the result of a written complaint and request for hearing filed pursuant to Section 1858, and the complaint concerns medical malpractice insurance, the complainant may petition the court for an order to compel compliance with this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1858.2.

(a) If the insurer, organization, group, or association does not make those changes as may be necessary to correct the noncompliance specified in the notice issued under Section 1858.1, or if the insurer, organization, group, or association has failed to establish to the satisfaction of the commissioner that the noncompliance does not exist, the commissioner shall hold a public hearing by mailing a notice to that insurer, organization, group, or association not less than 30 days prior to the date set for hearing specifying the matters to be considered at the hearing.

(b) In the event that the insurer and complainant resolve the matter and the insurer has consented to a rating modification, then that modification shall apply to other policyholders underwritten by the insurer for that class of insurance.

(c) If the insurer, organization, group, or association has refused to enter into informal conciliation at the request of the commissioner, the commissioner may hold a public hearing, whether or not the complaint was accompanied by a request for a public hearing, by mailing a notice to the insurer, organization, group, or association not less than 30 days prior to the date set for hearing specifying the matters to be considered at the hearing.

(d) If a hearing noticed under subdivisions (a) and (c) is based upon a complaint made pursuant to Section 1858, the commissioner shall also mail notice to the complainant not less than 30 days prior to the date set for hearing specifying the matters to be considered at the hearing.

(e) If upon sufficient complaint as provided in Section 1858 and upon review and investigation of the complaint, the commissioner has good cause to believe that the insurer, organization, group, or association, or any rate, rating plan, or rating system made or used by that insurer or rating organization, does not comply with the requirements and standards of this chapter applicable to it, the commissioner shall hold a public hearing by mailing a notice to the complainant and to the insurer, organization, group, or association not less than 30 days prior to the date set for hearing specifying the matters to be considered at the hearing.

(f) Within 60 days of submission of a matter for decision following a public hearing thereon pursuant to this section, the commissioner shall issue his or her decision or order.

(g) With respect to public hearings under this section, the commissioner may at his or her discretion, grant preference to a hearing in which the complainant has reached the age of 70 years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1176, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1858.3.

If after a hearing pursuant to Section 1858.2 the commissioner finds:

(a) That any rate, rating plan, or rating system violates the provisions of this chapter applicable to it, he or she shall issue an order to the insurer or rating organization which has been the subject of the hearing specifying in what respects that violation exists and stating when, within a reasonable period of time, the further use of that rate or rating system by that insurer or rating organization in contracts of insurance made thereafter shall be prohibited. The commissioner may, in addition to that order, direct the insurer or rating organization to take such other corrective action as he or she may deem necessary and proper.

(b) That an insurer, rating organization, advisory organization, or a group, association or other organization of insurers which engages in joint underwriting or joint reinsurance, is in violation of the provisions of this chapter applicable to it other than the provisions dealing with rates, rating plans, or rating systems, he or she may issue an order to that insurer, organization, group, or association which has been the subject of the hearing specifying in what respects that violation exists and requiring compliance within a reasonable time thereafter.

(c) Any order of the commissioner issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall specify the amount of the penalty due under Section 1858.07, and any order issued pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) shall provide that, in addition, a money penalty of not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) shall attach and be collected by the commissioner for each day such person fails to comply within the time specified therein with the provisions of that order in the same manner as that provided in Section 1858.1. This penalty shall not exceed in the aggregate the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) plus any penalty due under Section 1858.07.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 726, Sec. 3.   Effective September 25, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

1858.35.

On or before May 1 of each year, the commissioner shall submit a report to the Legislature and the Governor stating the number and type of complaints received under this article and the status and disposition of these complaints. The commissioner may make any recommendations for improving the efficiency and effectiveness of complaint handling under this article.

No information shall be provided under this section pertaining to a specified complaint against a specific insurer or rating organization. However, the commissioner may report that information in the aggregate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1381, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1858.4.

In addition to other penalties provided in this code, the commissioner shall suspend or revoke, in whole or in part, the license of any rating organization or the certificate of authority of any insurer with respect to the class or classes of insurance specified in that order, which fails to comply within the time limited by that order or any extension thereof which the commissioner may grant, with an order of the commissioner lawfully made by him or her pursuant to Section 1858.3 and effective pursuant to Section 1858.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1289, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

1858.5.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all proceedings in connection with the denial, suspension or revocation of a license or certificate of authority under this chapter shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the commissioner shall have all the powers granted to him therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 805.)
-------------------------------------------

1858.6.

Any finding, determination, rule, ruling or order made by the commissioner under this chapter shall be subject to review by the courts of the State and proceedings on review shall be in accordance with the provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure. In such proceedings on review, the court is authorized and directed to exercise its independent judgment on the evidence and unless the weight of the evidence supports the findings, determination, rule, ruling or order of the commissioner, the same shall be annulled.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a petition for review of any such finding, determination, rule or order, may be filed at any time before the effective date thereof. No such finding, determination, rule, or order shall become effective before the expiration of 20 days after notice and a copy thereof are mailed or delivered to the person affected, and any finding, determination, rule, or order of the commissioner so submitted for review shall not become effective for a further period of 15 days after the petition for review is filed with the court. The court may stay the effectiveness thereof for a longer period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 174.)
-------------------------------------------

1858.7.

Whenever the commissioner determines that a rate is excessive or not excessive, he shall, upon the written request of any complainant, disclose the basis upon which such rate was determined to be excessive or not excessive in writing to the complainant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Penalties [1859. - 1859.1.]

1859.

No person, insurer or organization shall wilfully withhold information from, or knowingly give false or misleading information to, the commissioner or to any rating organization, advisory organization, insurer or group, association or other organization of insurers, which will affect the rates, rating systems or premiums for the classes of insurance to which the provisions of this chapter are applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 805.)
-------------------------------------------

1859.1.

(a) Any person, insurer, organization, group, or association who fails to comply with a final order of the commissioner under this chapter shall be liable to the state in an amount not exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) but if the failure is willful he or she or it shall be liable to the state in an amount not exceeding two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for the failure. That penalty shall be in addition to any penalty arising under Section 1858.07. The commissioner shall collect the amount so payable and may bring an action in the name of the people of the State of California to enforce collection. These penalties may be in addition to any other penalties provided by law.

(b) A willful violation of this chapter by any person is a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 726, Sec. 4.   Effective September 25, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Miscellaneous [1860. - 1860.3.]

1860.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit or regulate the payment of dividends, savings or unabsorbed premium deposits allowed or returned by insurers to their policyholders, members or subscribers. A plan for the payment of dividends, savings or unabsorbed premium deposits allowed or returned by insurers to their policyholders, members or subscribers shall not be deemed a rating plan or system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 805.)
-------------------------------------------

1860.1.

No act done, action taken or agreement made pursuant to the authority conferred by this chapter shall constitute a violation of or grounds for prosecution or civil proceedings under any other law of this State heretofore or hereafter enacted which does not specifically refer to insurance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 805.)
-------------------------------------------

1860.2.

The administration and enforcement of this chapter shall be governed solely by the provisions of this chapter. Except as provided in this chapter, no other law relating to insurance and no other provisions in this code heretofore or hereafter enacted shall apply to or be construed as supplementing or modifying the provisions of this chapter unless such other law or other provision expressly so provides and specifically refers to the sections of this chapter which it intends to supplement or modify.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 805.)
-------------------------------------------

1860.3.

The provisions of the following sections of this code shall be applicable to the administration, enforcement and interpretation of this chapter:

Sections 1 to 41, both inclusive, 100 to 121, both inclusive, 620, 621, 700, 701, 704, 730 to 737, both inclusive, 12903, 12904, 12919, 12921, 12921.5, 12924 to 12926, both inclusive, 12928, 12930, and 12974 to 12977, both inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 677.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. [Reduction and Control of Insurance Rates] [1861.01. - 1861.16.]

1861.01.

Insurance Rate Rollback. (a) For any coverage for a policy for automobile and any other form of insurance subject to this chapter issued or renewed on or after November 8, 1988, every insurer shall reduce its charges to levels which are at least 20% less than the charges for the same coverage which were in effect on November 8, 1987.

(b) Between November 8, 1988,
 and November 8, 1989, rates and premiums reduced pursuant to subdivision (a) may be only increased if the commissioner finds, after a hearing, that an insurer is substantially threatened with insolvency.

(c) Commencing November 8, 1989, insurance rates subject to this chapter must be approved by the commissioner prior to their use.

(d) For those who apply for an automobile insurance policy for the first time on or after November 8, 1988, the rate shall be 20% less than the rate which was in effect on November 8, 1987, for similarly situated risks.

(e) Any separate affiliate of an insurer, established on or after November 8, 1987, shall be subject to the provisions of this section and shall reduce its charges to levels which are at least 20% less than the insurer’s charges in effect on that date.

(History: Added November 8, 1988, by initiative Proposition 103.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.02.

(a) Rates and premiums for an automobile insurance policy, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 660, shall be determined by application of the following factors in decreasing order of importance:

(1) The insured’s driving safety record.

(2) The number of miles he or she drives annually.

(3) The number of years of driving experience the insured has had.

(4) Those other factors that the commissioner may adopt by regulation and that have a substantial relationship to the risk of loss.
 The regulations shall set forth the respective weight to be given each factor in determining automobile rates and premiums. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the use of any criterion without approval shall constitute unfair discrimination.

(b) (1) Every person who meets the criteria of Section 1861.025 shall be qualified to purchase a Good Driver Discount policy from the insurer of his or her choice. An insurer shall not refuse to offer and sell a Good Driver Discount policy to any person who meets the standards of this subdivision.

(2) The rate charged for a Good Driver Discount policy shall comply with subdivision (a) and shall be at least 20 percent below the rate the insured would otherwise have been charged for the same coverage. Rates for Good Driver Discount policies shall be approved pursuant to this article.

(3) (A) This subdivision shall not prevent a reciprocal insurer, organized prior to November 8, 1988, by a motor club holding a certificate of authority under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 12160) of Part 5 of Division 2, and that requires membership in the motor club as a condition precedent to applying for insurance from requiring membership in the motor club as a condition precedent to obtaining insurance described in this subdivision.

(B) This subdivision shall not prevent an insurer that requires membership in a specified voluntary, nonprofit organization, which was in existence prior to November 8, 1988, as a condition precedent to applying for insurance issued to or through those membership groups, including franchise groups, from requiring that membership as a condition to applying for the coverage offered to members of the group, provided that it or
 an affiliate also offers and sells coverage to those who are not members of those membership groups.

(C) However, all of the following conditions shall be applicable to the insurance authorized by subparagraphs (A) and (B):

(i) Membership, if conditioned, is conditioned only on timely payment of membership dues and other bona fide criteria not based upon driving record or insurance, provided that membership in a motor club may not be based on residence in any area within the state.

(ii) Membership dues are paid solely for and in consideration of the membership and membership benefits and bear a reasonable relationship to the benefits provided. The amount of the dues shall not depend on whether the member purchases insurance offered by the membership organization. None of those membership dues or any portion thereof
 shall be transferred by the membership organization to the insurer, or any affiliate of the insurer, attorney-in-fact, subsidiary, or holding company thereof, provided that this provision shall not prevent any bona fide transaction between the membership organization and those entities.

(iii) Membership provides bona fide services or benefits in addition to the right to apply for insurance. Those services shall be reasonably available to all members within each class of membership.

Any insurer that violates clause (i), (ii), or (iii) shall be subject to the penalties set forth in Section 1861.14.

(c) The absence of prior automobile insurance coverage, in and of itself, shall not be a criterion for determining eligibility for a Good Driver Discount policy, or generally for automobile rates, premiums, or insurability.

(d) An insurer may refuse to sell a Good Driver Discount policy insuring a motorcycle unless all named insureds have been licensed to drive a motorcycle for the previous three years.

(e) This section shall become operative on November 8, 1989. The commissioner shall adopt regulations implementing this section and insurers may submit applications pursuant to this article which comply with those regulations prior to that date, provided that no such application shall be approved prior to that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 348, Sec. 14.   (AB 1515)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 1988, by initiative Prop. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.025.

A person is qualified to purchase a Good Driver Discount policy if he or she meets all of the following criteria:

(a) He or she has been licensed to drive a motor vehicle for the previous three years.

(b) During the previous three years, he or she has not done any of the following:

(1) Had more than one violation point count determined as provided by subdivision (a), (b), (c), (d), (f), or (j) of, or paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of, Section 12810 of the Vehicle Code, but subject to the following modifications:

(A) For the purposes of this section, the driver of a motor vehicle involved in an accident for which he or she was principally at fault that resulted only in damage to property shall receive one violation point count, in addition to any other violation points that may be imposed for this accident.

(B) If, under Section 488 or 488.5, an insurer is prohibited from increasing the premium on a policy on account of a violation, that violation shall not be included in determining the point count of the person.

(C) If a violation is required to be reported under Section 1816 of the Vehicle Code, or under Section 784 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or any other provision requiring the reporting of a violation by a minor, the violation shall be included for the purposes of this section in determining the point count in the same manner as is applicable to adult
 violations.

(2) Had more than one dismissal pursuant to Section 1803.5 of the Vehicle Code that was not made confidential pursuant to Section 1808.7 of the Vehicle Code, in the 36-month period for violations that would have resulted in the imposition of more than one violation point count under paragraph (1) if the complaint had not been dismissed.

(3) Was the driver of a motor vehicle involved in an accident that resulted in bodily injury or in the death of any person and was principally at fault. The commissioner shall adopt regulations setting guidelines to be used by insurers for the determination of fault for the purposes of this paragraph and paragraph (1).

(c) During the period commencing on January 1, 1999, or the date 10 years prior to the date of application for the issuance or renewal of the Good Driver
 Discount policy, whichever is later, and ending on the date of the application for the issuance or renewal of the Good Driver Discount policy, he or she has not been convicted of a violation of Section 23140, 23152, or 23153 of the Vehicle Code, a felony violation of Section 23550 or 23566, or former Section 23175 or, as those sections read on January 1, 1999, of the Vehicle Code, or a violation of Section 191.5 or subdivision (a) of Section 192.5 of the Penal Code.

(d) Any person who claims that he or she meets the criteria of subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) based entirely or partially on a driver’s license and driving experience acquired anywhere other than in the United States or Canada is rebuttably presumed to be qualified to purchase a Good Driver Discount policy if he or she has been licensed to drive in the United States or Canada for at least the previous 18 months and meets the criteria of subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) for that
 period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 348, Sec. 15.   (AB 1515)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.03.

(a) The business of insurance shall be subject to the laws of California applicable to any other business, including, but not limited to, civil rights laws (Sections 51 to 53, inclusive, of the Civil Code), and the antitrust and unfair business practices laws (Parts 2 (commencing with Section 16600) and 3 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code).

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit (1) any agreement to collect, compile and disseminate historical data on paid claims or reserves for reported claims, provided such data is contemporaneously transmitted to the commissioner, (2) participation in any joint arrangement established by statute or the commissioner to
 assure availability of insurance, (3) any agent or broker, representing one or more insurers, from obtaining from any insurer it represents information relative to the premium for any policy or risk to be underwritten by that insurer, (4) any agent or broker from disclosing to an insurer it represents any quoted rate or charge offered by another insurer represented by that agent or broker for the purpose of negotiating a lower rate, charge, or term from the insurer to whom the disclosure is made, or (5) any agents, brokers, or insurers from utilizing or participating with multiple insurers or reinsurers for underwriting a single risk or group of risks.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a notice of cancellation or nonrenewal of a policy for automobile insurance shall be effective only if it is based on one or more of the following reasons: (A) nonpayment of premium; (B) fraud or material misrepresentation
 affecting the policy or insured; (C) a substantial increase in the hazard insured against.

(2) This subdivision shall not prevent a reciprocal insurer, organized prior to November 8, 1988, by a motor club holding a certificate of authority under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 12160) of Part 5 of Division 2, and which requires membership in the motor club as a condition precedent to applying for insurance, from issuing an effective notice of nonrenewal based solely on the failure of the insured to maintain membership in the motor club. This subdivision shall also not prevent an insurer which issues private passenger automobile coverage to members of groups that were in existence prior to November 8, 1988, whether membership, franchise, or otherwise, and to those who are not members of groups from issuing an effective notice of nonrenewal for coverage provided to the insured as a member of the group based solely on the failure of the insured
 to maintain that membership if (i) the insurer offers to renew the coverage to the insured on a nongroup basis, or (ii) to transfer the coverage to an affiliated insurer. The rates charged by the insurer or affiliated insurer shall have been adopted pursuant to this article. However, all of the following conditions shall be applicable to that insurance:

(A) Membership, if conditioned, is conditioned only on timely payment of membership dues and other bona fide criteria not based upon driving record or insurance, provided that membership in a motor club may not be based on residence in any area within the state.

(B) Membership dues are paid solely for and in consideration of the membership and membership benefits and bear a reasonable relationship to the benefits provided. The amount of the dues shall not depend on whether the member purchases insurance offered by the membership
 organization. None of those membership dues or any portion thereof shall be transferred by the membership organization to the insurer, or any affiliate of the insurer, attorney-in-fact, subsidiary, or holding company thereof, provided that this provision shall not prevent any bona fide transaction between the membership organization and those entities.

(C) Membership provides bona fide services or benefits in addition to the right to apply for insurance. Those services shall be reasonably available to all members within each class of membership.

Any insurer that violates subparagraphs (A), (B), or (C) shall be subject to the penalties set forth in Section 1861.14.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 776, Sec. 13.   (AB 3250)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 1988, by initiative Prop. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.04.

Full Disclosure of Insurance Information. (a) Upon request, and for a reasonable fee to cover costs, the commissioner shall provide consumers with a comparison of the rate in effect for each personal line of insurance for every insurer.

(History: Added November 8, 1988, by initiative Proposition 103.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.05.

Approval of Insurance Rates. (a) No rate shall be approved or remain in effect which is excessive, inadequate, unfairly discriminatory or otherwise in violation of this chapter. In considering whether a rate is excessive, inadequate or unfairly discriminatory, no consideration shall be given to the degree of competition
 and the commissioner shall consider whether the rate mathematically reflects the insurance company’s investment income.

(b) Every insurer which desires to change any rate shall file a complete rate application with the commissioner. A complete rate application shall include all data referred to in Sections 1857.7, 1857.9, 1857.15, and 1864 and such other information as the commissioner may require. The applicant shall have the burden of proving that the requested rate change is justified and meets the requirements of this article.

(c) The commissioner shall notify the public of any application by an insurer for a rate change. The application shall be deemed approved sixty days after public notice unless (1) a consumer or his or her representative requests a hearing within forty-five days of public notice and the commissioner grants the hearing, or determines not to grant the
 hearing and issues written findings in support of that decision, or (2) the commissioner on his or her own motion determines to hold a hearing, or (3) the proposed rate adjustment exceeds 7% of the then applicable rate for personal lines or 15% for commercial lines, in which case the commissioner must hold a hearing upon a timely request. In any event, a rate change application shall be deemed approved 180 days after the rate application is received by the commissioner (A) unless that application has been disapproved by a final order of the commissioner subsequent to a hearing, or (B) extraordinary circumstances exist. For purposes of this section, “received” means the date delivered to the department.

(d) For purposes of this section, extraordinary circumstances include the following:

(1) Rate change application hearings commenced during the 180-day period provided by subdivision
 (c). If a hearing is commenced during the 180-day period, the rate change application shall be deemed approved upon expiration of the 180-day period or 60 days after the close of the record of the hearing, whichever is later, unless disapproved prior to that date.

(2) Rate change applications that are not approved or disapproved within the 180-day period provided by subdivision (c) as a result of a judicial proceeding directly involving the application and initiated by the applicant or an intervenor. During the pendency of the judicial proceedings, the 180-day period is tolled, except that in no event shall the commissioner have less than 30 days after conclusion of the judicial proceedings to approve or disapprove the application. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, nothing shall preclude the commissioner from disapproving an application without a hearing if a stay is in effect barring the commissioner from holding a hearing within the
 180-day period.

(3) The hearing has been continued pursuant to Section 11524 of the Government Code. The 180-day period provided by subdivision (c) shall be tolled during any period in which a hearing is continued pursuant to Section 11524 of the Government Code. A continuance pursuant to Section 11524 of the Government Code shall be decided on a case by case basis. If the hearing is commenced or continued during the 180-day period, the rate change application shall be deemed approved upon the expiration of the 180-day period or 100 days after the case is submitted, whichever is later, unless disapproved prior to that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 646, Sec. 1.   Effective October 1, 1993.   Applicable as prescribed by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1257, Sec. 3, as amended by Sec. 2 of Ch. 646.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 1988, by initiative Prop. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.055.

(a) The commissioner shall adopt regulations governing hearings required by subdivision (c) of Section 1861.05 on or before 120 days after the enactment of this section. Those regulations shall, at the minimum, include timelines for scheduling and commencing hearings, and procedures to prevent delays in commencing or continuing hearings without good cause.

(b) The sole remedy for failure by the commissioner to adopt the
 regulations required by subdivision (a) within the prescribed period or to abide by those regulations once adopted shall be a writ of mandate by any aggrieved party in a court of competent jurisdiction to compel the commissioner to adopt those regulations, or commence or resume hearings.

(c) Nothing in this section shall preclude the commissioner from commencing hearings required by subdivision (c) of Section 1861.05 prior to adopting the regulations required by this section.

(d) The administrative law judge shall render a decision within 30 days of the closing of the record in the proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1583, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.06.

Public notice required by this article shall be made through distribution to the news media and to any member of the public who requests placement on a mailing list for that purpose.

(History: Added November 8, 1988, by initiative Proposition 103.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.07.

All information provided to the commissioner pursuant to this article shall be available for public inspection, and the provisions of Section 7929.000 of the Government Code and Section 1857.9 of the Insurance Code shall not apply thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 306.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.08.

Hearings shall be conducted pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, except that:

(a) Hearings shall be conducted by administrative law judges for purposes of Sections 11512 and 11517, chosen under Section 11502 or appointed by the
 commissioner.

(b) Hearings are commenced by a filing of a notice in lieu of Sections 11503 and 11504.

(c) The commissioner shall adopt, amend, or reject a decision only under Section 11518.5 and subdivisions (b), (c), and (e) of Section 11517 and solely on the basis of the record as provided in Section 11425.50 of the Government Code.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 11501, Section 11430.30 and subdivision (b) of Section 11430.70 shall not apply in these hearings.

(e) Discovery shall be liberally construed and disputes determined by the administrative law judge as provided in Section 11507.7 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 390, Sec. 10.   Effective August 19, 1996.   Operative July 1, 1997, by Sec. 11 of Ch. 390.    Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 1988, by initiative Prop. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.09.

Judicial review shall be in accordance with Section 1858.6. For purposes of judicial review, a decision to hold a hearing is not a final order or decision; however, a decision not to hold a hearing is final.

(History: Added November 8, 1988, by initiative Proposition 103.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.10.

Consumer Participation. (a) Any person may initiate or intervene in any proceeding permitted or established pursuant to this chapter, challenge any action of the commissioner under this article, and enforce any provision of this article.

(b) The commissioner or a court shall award reasonable advocacy and witness fees and expenses to any person who demonstrates that (1) the person represents the interests of consumers, and, (2) that he or she has made a substantial contribution to the adoption of any order, regulation, or decision by the commissioner or a court. Where such advocacy occurs in response to a rate application, the award shall be paid by the applicant.

(c) All requests for a finding of eligibility to seek compensation and all findings of eligibility, as described in Section 2662.2 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations, shall be published on the Department of Insurance Internet Web site during the eligibility period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 100, Sec. 1.   (AB 2406)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 1988, by initiative Prop. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.11.

Emergency Authority. In the event that the commissioner finds that (a) insurers have substantially withdrawn from any insurance market covered by this article, including insurance described by Section 660, and (b) a market assistance plan would not be sufficient to make insurance available, the commissioner shall establish a joint underwriting authority in the manner set forth by Section 11891, without the prior creation of a market assistance
 plan.

(History: Added November 8, 1988, by initiative Proposition 103.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.12.

Group Insurance Plans. Any insurer may issue any insurance coverage on a group plan, without restriction as to the purpose of the group, occupation or type of group. Group insurance rates shall not be considered to be unfairly discriminatory, if they are averaged broadly among persons insured under the group plan.

(History: Added November 8, 1988, by initiative Proposition 103.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.13.

Application. This article shall apply to all insurance on risks or on operations in this state, except those listed in Section 1851.

(History: Added November 8, 1988, by initiative Proposition 103.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.137.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 1861.13, credit insurance shall not be subject to Sections 1861.01 and 1861.05. However, any rate for credit insurance shall be filed with the commissioner before it may be used in this state, and that rate may be used immediately upon filing with the commissioner.

(b) The rates for credit insurance shall not be excessive,